Utah statutes.
20A-3-304.1.   Election officer to provide voting history information and
status.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Qualified absentee ballot application" means an absentee ballot
application filed under Section 20A-3-304 from a voter who the election
officer determines is eligible to receive an absentee ballot.
(b) "Voting history record" means the information about the existence and
status of absentee ballot requests required by this section.
(2) (a)  Each election officer shall maintain, in the election officer's
office, a voting history record of those voters that have cast a vote by:
(i)  absentee ballot; and
(ii)  early voting.
(b)  The voting history record is a public record under Title 63G, Chapter 2,
Government Records Access and Management Act.
(3)  The election officer shall ensure that the voting history record for each
voting precinct contains:
(a)  for absentee voting:
(i)  the name and address of each person who has filed a qualified absentee
ballot application;
(ii)  the date that the application was received; and
(iii)  the current status of each qualified absentee ballot application
including specifically:
(A)  the date that the absentee ballot was mailed to the voter; and
(B)  the date that the voted absentee ballot was received by the election
officer; and
(b)  for early voting:
(i)  the name and address of each person who has voted during the early voting
period; and
(ii)  the date the person's vote was cast.
(4) (a)  Notwithstanding the time limits for response to a request for records
under Section 63G-2-204 or the time limits for a request for records
established in any ordinance, the election officer shall ensure that the
information required by this section is recorded and made available to the
public no later than one business day after its receipt in the election
officer's office.
(b)  Notwithstanding the fee requirements of Section 63G-2-203 or the fee
requirements established in any ordinance, the election officer shall make
copies of the voting history record available to the public for the actual
cost of production or copying.
